Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.15
Governing board, defined.

Governing board means the body containing representatives from each state that is a member of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement that is responsible for approving membership or withdrawal of states to the agreement, registering retailers to collect sales and use tax from purchasers in the member states, certifying service providers and automated systems for collecting sales and use taxes, approving monetary allowances for certified service providers and certified automated systems, resolving disputes among member states or with retailers or certified service providers, and otherwise executing the provisions of the agreement for the benefit of the member states under the terms of the agreement.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 19.